Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Death of Mother or Child

§ 93-9-71.
Death of mother; effect on paternity proceeding.

The death of the mother shall not abate the paternity prosecution, if the child be living; but a suggestion of the fact shall be made, and the name of the child substituted in the proceedings for that of the mother, and a guardian ad litem shall be appointed by the court to prosecute the cause, who shall not be liable for costs; and in such case the testimony of the mother, taken in writing before the justice, may be read in evidence, and shall have the same force and effect as if she were living and had testified to the same in court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 253; 1906, § 272; Hemingway’s 1917, § 221; 1930, § 183; 1942, § 387.

§ 93-9-73.
Dying declarations of mother.

In all proceedings to determine the parentage of a child when the mother is dead, her declarations in her travail, proved to be her dying declarations, may, on the trial of the case, be received in evidence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 257; 1906, § 276; Hemingway’s 1917, § 225; 1930, § 187; 1942, § 391; Laws, 2011, ch. 376, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2011).

§ 93-9-75.
Death of child; effect on paternity proceeding.

The death of the child, if the mother be living and unmarried, shall not be cause of abatement or bar to any suit brought under this chapter; but the court trying the same shall, on conviction, give judgment for such sum as shall be deemed just.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 254; 1906, § 273; Hemingway’s 1917, § 222; 1930, § 184; 1942, § 388; Laws, 2011, ch. 376, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2011).